Authors
David Nusair
Number of Reviews
44

Title
Review for Duoluo tianshi (1995)
Wong Kar-Wei's "Fallen Angels" is, on a purely visceral level, one of the
most exciting films I've seen in a long while.  Unfortunately, Wong seems
more interested in experimenting with his camera than creating tangible
characters for the audience to root for.
Ordinarily, that alone would be enough to sink a movie, but in the case of
"Fallen Angels", this is not so.  Every shot in this film is exciting just
to *look* at.  Wong does really interesting things with the camera, but he
doesn't allow the pyrotechnics to completely take over, as was the case
with last years dismal "Knock Off" (which contained a shot of a foot
entering a shoe.  Ugh.)
The movie follows three pairs of lost souls as they struggle to find some
meaning in their lives.  I can't say much more than that as I didn't
really know what was going on most of the time.  In fact, it wasn't until
about halfway through the movie that I was able to distinguish between
each character.  The constantly moving camera doesn't really allow for
the audience to associate with any one character.  We're always kept at a
distance from these people, I suppose in order to further add to the
feeling of alienation felt by the characters.
"Fallen Angels" is a refreshing change-of-pace from most Hollywood films,
which never bother to try anything different, at least on a visual level. 
In fact, I'd go so far as to say that "Fallen Angels" is more challenging
visually than any mainstream Hollywood film I've ever seen.  Sure, there's
directors like Robert Rodriguez who enjoy turning violence into operatic
orgies of death, but to see a filmmaker like Wong who actually assaults
the senses with images is truly something worth celebrating.  
But if Wong wishes to become a legendary filmmaker, he needs to work on
incorporating an actual story into those awesome images.  There were far
too many instances during "Fallen Angels" in which I asked myself, "now
who are these people again?  Is this that first couple or the second
couple?"  It was impossible to keep track.  Perhaps he could let the
audience know right away which character is which, by introducing them to
us with "name cards", as in Scorsese's "Mean Streets".
That's really besides the point, though.  Wong Kar-Wei has proven himself,
through very few films, that's he's a movie-maker to watch.  Let's just
hope that he hones his storytelling skills with his next few movies.

Title
Review for One Eight Seven (1997)
In "187", Samuel L. Jackson stars as a teacher in the inner city.  As
the movie opens, he's been attacked by one of his former students and 
left for dead.  Cut to several months later, he's recuperated and ready
to start teaching again.  He's transfered to an even more dangerous
high school, but this does not faze Jackson.  No, it does not faze him
because he is going to Change the System.  He's an idealist.  And the
fact that all his pupils wield weapons of some kind doesn't bother him.
He believes that there is some good in everyone, even if they stab you
11 times in the back with a knife.
Pardon my facetious tone, but the first half of "187" is so cliched, so 
over-wrought that one can't help but be a little cynical about it.
It takes virtually every element generally found in films of this 
calibre ("Dangerous Minds" and "Stand and Deliver" being the most 
prominent examples).
Fortunately, after that rather unoriginal beginning, the film takes an
unexpected turn that quite frankly I hadn't predicted.  Not to give too
much away, Jackson eventually tires of all the abuse and begins to 
fight back.  In other films of this type, the hero-teacher ends up
"saving" the bad kids and everyone's happy.  Not so in "187".  Ol'
Sammy completely loses his cool after a certain point and starts
kicking some serious ass.
I appreciated that aspect of "187".  Just when I thought I had the
whole story figured out, the screenwriter throws a rather large
spanner in the works.  Predictability is a big problems with most movies
these days, so it was nice to have a movie that kept me guessing as to
what would happen next and also as to how the film would end.  Another
nice touch is the directing by Kevin Reynolds.  He's shot the film in
mostly brown colours, which only adds to the feeling of desperation
Jackson's character is experiencing.  I also liked how, in one moment
of rage, the camera following Jackson began shaking.  I'd never seen
anything like that, and in this age of Michael Bay-type of nonsensical
camera pyrotechnics, it was nice to see a director use his camera as
an instrument to further display the emotions of his characters, rather
than as a tool to "excite" the audience.
"187", much like the "Death Wish" series, got a little carried away
as it progressed, but nevertheless, it's an entertaining look at how
deeply violence can affect a regular person.
-- 
David Nusair                                http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair"As I have pointed out before, Andre Rousimoff's portrayal of a giant in
"The Princess Bride", Richard Dawson's portrayal of an obnoxious game show
host in "The Running Man", and Courtney Love's portrayal of a junkie hooker
in "The People vs Larry Flynt"."
        -R. Wiley on the all-time biggest Oscar snubs

Title
Review for Detective Story (1951)
Starring Kirk Douglas, William Bendix, Lee Grant
Kirk Douglas is one of those rare American actors who can say more with a
simple glance than most can say with pages of dialogue.  All he has to do
is look at someone with a raised eyebrow, and you instantly know what he's
thinking.
"Detective Story" features one of Kirk Douglas's finest performances.  He
stars as a New York detective that has his whole world fall apart in one
night.  The film is based on a play, and this is quite evident, as most of
the movie takes place in the one-room flat that the detective's work in.
The film opens with the Douglas character getting ready to go home to his
wife, but through a series of events, he never quite makes it there.  The
bulk of the movie follows the case of a man named Schneider, a surgeon who
routinely performs abortions with a high fatality rate.  However, this
Schneider character has a connection in the past of Douglas's wife; a
connection Douglas himself is not aware of.  Many secrets are revealed in
the last half hour of this film.  Secrets I would not dream of giving
away. 
With a name like "Detective Story", one would assume the film would
resemble an episode of "NYPD Blue", but it doesn't quite work out that
way.  However, we do see Douglas at work on a few other cases throughout
the running time.  Lee Grant (virtually unrecognizable) plays a meek
Jewish woman arrested for shoplifting.  Her scenes with Bendix, another
detective, provide the movie with a few laughs.
The performances all around are fantastic.  Douglas may be the leader of
this ensemble, but he's not the center of attention all the time.  We get
to catch a glimpse into other cases and other detectives working on those
cases.
Which brings me back to Douglas.  He has a really emotional scene towards
the end of the picture that really makes you feel for him.  We can see
that this is a man who has spent his whole life trying to eliminate crime,
but has finally realized that what he's really done is gotten back at his
criminal father.  How he handles coming to terms with this is something
really worth seeing.
Kirk Douglas is the kind of actor we don't seem to see to much of these
days:  He's a tough guy, but the human elements are never hidden too
deeply underneath that gruff exterior.

Title
Review for Stolen Hours (1963)
"Stolen Hours" asks a very intriguing question:  If you found out you had
only a year left in which to live your life, how would you live it?  It's
a question most people never want to think about, but one which the
central character of "Stolen Hours" is faced with.
Susan Hayward plays that character, a woman suffering from headaches and
minor paralysis, who discovers that she has a terminal form of brain
cancer and has 10 to 12 months to live.  She is tricked by some friends
into seeing a doctor at a party she is holding, and he ends up becoming
both her full-time physician and later on, her husband.
It's a tough subject and the film handles it well.  About halfway through,
I realized something.  I realized that I was watching a movie intended for
adults.  In this day and age when the 18-25 demographic is the most
important thing out there, it was a refreshing change to watch a movie
that was not meant for adolescents.  This is a film about the fear that
comes with knowing that the end is near.
Hayward handles the part excellently.  She doesn't get hysterical as one
might expect, but instead handles herself with a quiet dignity that is
almost heartbreaking.  She wants to get the audience to put themselves in
her place, to think about how information like that would change a persons
life.  She gives a very open and honest performance, and I didn't find any
inconsistencies in it.
"Stolen Hours" is the type of film that is rarely made anymore.  There are
no major conflicts within the story, no big revelations made, and no
useless sub-plots.  That's too bad, because movies like this are what make
watching movies interesting.  They make you think.
-- 
David Nusair                                      dnusair@chat.carleton.ca
Come visit my "Reel Film Reviews" site! "http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair" 

Title
Review for Gia (1998) (TV)
Starring Angelina Jolie, Faye Dunaway
In "Gia", Angelina Jolie plays the titular character, the first so-called
supermodel.  And right there you have the biggest hurdle this movie had to
overcome (in my eyes, anyway).  I just don't see how the life of a model
is worthy of a two hour film.  Despite this, I kept an open mind when I
began watching the movie.  Sadly, though, my fears were realized.  It's
just not possible to make an interesting, full-length film about a person
who spends their days wearing different clothes.
The movie follows the rise and fall of Gia (no last name), a tumultuous
woman who doesn't particularly enjoy the world of fashion.  She becomes
famous more quickly than she can handle, and finds herself hooked on drugs
and on a woman she cannot have.  The last hour of the film is just one
scene after another of Gia getting high, losing a job, and going into
rehab.  This formula is repeated several times, and I really got tired of
it.  In general, I tend to dislike movies featuring heavy drug use.  No
because it offends me or anything like that; it just bores me.  Quite
frankly, I don't see the appeal, so when a director shows me a
point-of-view shot of a junkie, complete with tipsy camera angles and
echoing voices, I am left somewhat unimpressed.
The first hour of the film, though, was actually quite engaging.  We see
Gia as she is discovered and moves to New York with her boyfriend.  These
early scenes were interesting.  We're shown the fashion world through a
newcomers eyes, and it was a perspective I hadn't seen before.  The movie
begins to go downhill, however, once Gia becomes an established model. 
>From that point, I lost all interest in the movie and was counting the
minutes before it would end.  It all seemed so excessive.  Fine, so Gia
had a drug problem, does this really need to dominate the film?  Couldn't
the same effect have been had with a five or ten minute montage of scenes
featuring Gia experimenting with drugs?  Or perhaps this film is meant to
be a warning to aspiring models not to get into the drug world.  Quite
possibly, although since I have no desire to become a model, this warning
is lost on me.
As I stated at the beginning of this review, I simply don't see how the
life of a model is worthy of a feature-length motion picture.  What do
they do that warrants a movie?  Strut their stuff for thousands of dollars
an hour?  I suppose the same could be said about making movies about
baseball players, for example, but at least somebody like Lou Gehrig led
an interesting life.  Gia did not.  And by the end of the film, all I knew
about Gia for sure was that she hated modelling, was bi-sexual, and was
heavily into drugs.  Not exactly a meaningful contribution to society, as
far as I'm concerned.

Title
Review for Heartbreak Kid, The (1972)
The Heartbreak Kid (Reviewed on Aug. 26th/1998)
Starring Charles Grodin, Cybill Sheppard, Eddie Albert
In "The Heartbreak Kid", Charles Grodin plays one of the most unbelievably
obnoxious characters I've seen on screen in a long time.  He's a guy who
spends virtually the entire running time of the movie bullshitting his way
from one situation to another.  I doubt he ever expressed any genuine
feeling at all during the film.
As the film opens, he has just gotten married, and is on the way to Miami
Beach for his honeymoon.  Halfway there, he begins to resent his bride. 
By the time he arrives at his hotel and has met the Cybill Sheppard
character, he is ready to divorce his wife.
As played by Grodin, this character is the type of person that nothing will
ever be good enough for him.  The phrase "the grass is always greener on
the other side of the fence" was practically written with him in mind. 
However, if he finds something he really wants, he will pursue it for as
long as it takes.  The only problem is, once he has it, he immediately
loses interest.  The end of "The Heartbreak Kid" is both hilarious and sad
for that very reason.
Charles Grodin is at his smarmy best here, and Sheppard is quite appealing
as the object of Grodin's desire.  However, the real scene stealer is
Jeannie Berlin, daughter of director Elaine May, as Grodin's whiny bride. 
She owns every scene that she's in, and makes you almost want to root for
what the Grodin character is trying to do.
"The Heartbreak Kid" was written by Neil Simon and it shows.  Simon loves
to deconstruct and analyze human relationships, and he's at the top of his
game here.  As maddeningly obnoxious as the Grodin character is, he's the
type of guy that everyone knows.  The character of George Costanza on
"Seinfeld" seems to have been modelled after him.
The only problem with the film is that it's not that funny, and it's
billed as a comedy.  As much as I could see the realism in the characters,
it would have been nice to have a chuckle here and there.
"The Heartbreak Kid" is not a date movie.  It has an extremely negative
view of relationships, so seeing it with a girlfriend/boyfriend, could be
hazardus to your health.
-- 
David Nusair                                      dnusair@chat.carleton.ca
Come visit my "Reel Film Reviews" site! "http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair" 

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
Starring Freddie Prinze Jr., Rachel Leigh Cook, Kevin Pollack
Ah, and 1999 was going along so well, too.
"She's All That" has the dubious distinction of being the worst movie I've
seen so far this year.  And quite frankly, I doubt I'll see anything
equally bad.  (At least, I *hope* I don't see anything equally bad).
"She's All That" tells the story of the most popular guy in school (played
by Freddie Prinze Jr.) who accepts a bet to transform the geekiest girl in
school (Rachel Leigh Cook) into the most popular.  That, right there, is
problem #1.  How many times have we seen this storyline?  As Cook comments
near the end of the film, "it's kind of like "Pretty Woman", except
without the prostitution".  Of course, had the filmmakers attempted to try
something new with this material, the well-worn storyline would have been
a device to propell the movie forward.  As it is, though, "She's All That"
relies *completely* on the lame and overused formula to push it ahead.
There's not one original or interesting character in the film, either, and
if that wasn't bad enough, there's not one good performance featured.  The
star of the movie, Rachel Leigh Cook, is simply horrible.  I usually don't
like to get so personal, but in this case, I think it needs to be said. 
Cook wears the same expression throughout the flick and looks to be having
as miserable a time as I was.  I was never convinced that she was a
"nerd", and her transformation was unconvincing and unnecessary.  The
movie seems to be saying it's better to be popular than to be who you are.
As for Freddie Prinze Jr., an actor I ordinarily enjoy, he too is quite
bad here.  He coasts through the film on so-called charm, and never
establishes a real character.
Kieren Culkin is here, too, as the brother of Cook.  And for some
indiscernable reason, he's got hearing aids.  No explanation is given and
they're never brought up.  Were we supposed to feel *sorry* for him just
because he wore hearing aids?  I don't think so.  That single element of
the film was one of the most offensive things I've seen in a movie in a
long time.
"She's All That" sucks.  That's what it boils down to.  It's not
entertaining, and it's not even a good time passer.  The hour and a half
running time goes by slower than a 5 minute hair-removal system
informercial.  And what's worse, it sends out a bad message to teens. 
It appears to be telling them, "hey, it doesn't matter if you're happy
the way you are.  That's unimportant.  If you want to *truly* be happy,
dress in the latest fashions and act like a bubble-headed moron."  Ugh.

Title
Review for For Hire (1997)
My obsession with Joe Mantegna has gotten to the point now where I'll rent
anything that he stars in.  It doesn't have to be a big part either; a
cameo role will do.  Mantegna is, to me, one of the coolest actors out
there, and I try not to miss anything he's in.
Such is the case with "For Hire", a movie I'd never even heard of until I
saw it in the video store.  Joe Mantegna stars as a controversial author
who's being stalked by an edgy source who fears he'll go public, thus
landing the source in a lot of trouble.  Rob Lowe enters the picture as a
friendly, down-on-his-luck cabbie who is on the recieving end of a very
unusual request from Mantegna.  Lowe is offered $50,000 to "take care" of
Mantegna's problem, and since he's just been diagnosed with terminal
prostate cancer, he agrees.
Sound convoluted?  It is.  However, for a while, it's enjoyable enough to
watch.  But after a while, things just start dragging along until the film
eventually reaches it's inevitable, not to mention predictable,
conclusion.  Once "For Hire" reaches a certain point, even the most
idiotic audience member should have no problem guessing what's going to
happen next.  And for a movie of this type, that would definitely be a bad
thing.  Movies like this need to keep the audience guessing throughout,
otherwise what's left?
It is, however, worth watching for Mantegna's performance.  He always
manages to rise above his material, and this is no exception.  It's too
bad, though, that he keeps appearing in these silly made-for-cable movies.
Don't get me wrong; some of them are quite good.  But an actor of this
calibre should really be doing more feature film work.  This is a man who
has worked heavily with esteemed playwright David Mamet, for crying out
loud.  Mantegna would do well to look at the career of William H. Macy,
another Mamet regular.  Macy isn't concerned with being the lead.  Rather,
he's concerned with finding quality roles, and if that role is a small
one, so be it.
"For Hire" is about as predictable as they come.  Joe Mantegna and even
Rob Lowe (sporting a ridiculous bleached-blond George Clooney haircut)
made this worth a look.

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
Starring Jean-Claude Van Damme, Rob Schneider, Lela Rochon, Paul Sorvino 
"Knock Off" is exactly that: a cheap knock off of an action movie.  It's
also the worst movie I have seen thus far this year.  I figured it would
be at least a couple of months before I saw the worst film of 1998, but
alas, it has already been found.
Jean-Claude Van Damme stars as (I think) a designer jeans executive who
discovers his half-brother has been supplying him with cheaper goods.  Rob
Schneider plays Van Damme's partner, and Rochon plays ... actually, I have
no idea who Rochon was supposed to be.  She just sort of popped up halfway
through without an explanation as to why she was there.  Many things are
not explained in this film, but I do know that for some bizarre reason,
Van Damme seemed to be doing a Jackie Chan impression throughout the
flick.  Where Chan comes off as endearing in his "normal guy" character
seen in many of his films, Van Damme just comes off as a wimp.  We're
never given any clear explanation as to the basis for many of his actions.
To be more clear:  I did not even know who he was supposed to be until
about an hour into the movie, and even then, it was not made too clear.
The film has been directed in the style of some strange film experiment
gone horribly wrong.  Tsui Hark (who directed Van Damme's last movie, the
bad, but not nearly as bad as this, "Double Team") never lets the camera
rest for a second, and that's no exaggeration.  We are even treated to a
five second shot from the point of view of Van Damme's foot entering a
shoe.  Fabulous!  Seriously, though, I have no problem with directors who
want to play around with film conventions, as long as they don't get
carried away.  For example, look at Sam Raimi.  "Army of Darkness", one of
his best movies, features some of the most inventive camera work I have
ever seen, but Raimi never lets the special effects get in the way of
story.  That's a concept that Tsui can't seem to grasp.  The special
effects and outrageous camera angles *rule* "Knock Off" to the point where
the audience doesn't have a clue as to what's happening any more.
Another problem with the film is that it looks cheap.  The film stock used
is of such low caliber that I thought I was watching one of those Chinese
films shown really late at night.  And for some inexplicable reason,
everyone's voice seems to have been dubbed.  Even the stars.  And even the
special effects, seemingly the only aspect of the film the director
actually cared about, are inconsistent.  For example, there is a scene in
which Van Damme drives a car out of a window.  The car slams into the
ground, and the left wheel is completely destroyed.  Seconds later, the
car drives off at full speed.  Hey, I have no problem suspending my
disbelief in an action movie, but a line must be drawn somewhere.
Finally, the acting.  Nobody gives a good performance in this film.  Van
Damme, an actor I usually like, is way off the mark playing "everyman". 
And Schneider, here to provide comic relief I assume, is totally unfunny
and over acts his way through every scene.  Even the usually solid Paul
Sorvino gives a terribly over-the-top performance as... Once again, I have
no idea who he was supposed to be.
In case I haven't yet made it clear enough, "Knock Off" is the worst movie
of Van Damme's career and possibly the worst movie of the decade.  And
it's not even one of those movies that's so bad it's funny.  It's too
inept to be funny.  There are no redeeming factors in "Knock Off" and I
seriously hope that every print of this film is burned to a crisp and that
somehow my memory of watching the film can be erased.
-- 
David Nusair                                      dnusair@chat.carleton.ca
Come visit my "Reel Film Reviews" site! "http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair" 

Title
Review for Proposition, The (1998)
Starring Kenneth Branagh, Madeline Stowe, William Hurt, Neil Patrick
Harris 
1998 has not been a very good year for Kenneth Branagh.  First he starred
in Robert Altman's pretentious mess, "The Gingerbread Man".  And now he's
in "The Proposition", a well-acted but dull period piece.
The film tells the story of a very rich man (Hurt) who wishes to have a
baby with his wife (Stowe), but is sterile, thus creating a bit of a snag
in his plan.  He decides to hire a surrogate (Harris) of sorts to father
his child, but complications arise when the surrogate becomes emotionally
attached to the wife of said rich man.
Where does Branagh fit into this convoluted scheme, you ask?  Well, he
portrays a priest who is new to the local parish, and who also has a shady
past.  It really doesn't matter, anyway.  By the time all the secrets are
revealed, the viewer has lost interest long ago.
"The Proposition" is a film that can't seem to decide what genre it wants
to fit into.  It's starts off as a run-of-the-mill period piece, but after
about 30 minutes, it begins jumping wildly from one type of film to
another.  In certain cases, this can work (see "Pulp Fiction" for such an
example), but here it just comes of as an unpolished mess.  And, worse of
all, the movie can't even finish what it starts.  It opens with Branagh's
character telling someone the story of what really happened to these four
people, so the film is a flashback.  By the end of the film, one would
expect that the movie would come out of the flashback and into the
present.  This doesn't even happen!  "The Proposition" has gotten totally
wrapped up in it's multpile forays into different genres, that it
completely disregards what has occured at the beginning of the film.
The acting, on the other hand, is quite good.  William Hurt, an actor who
has become quite complacent in his own smugness as of late, breaks out of
that mold with an exciting portrayal of a man who has all the money in the
world, but, in the end, finds that it is completely useless.  And Doogie
Howser himself, Neil Patrick Harris plays a character who is a polar
opposite of that famous TV doc.  Madeline Stowe rounds out the cast as the
woman who is caught in the middle of all three of these men, and she is
very convincing in her self-doubt and constant confusion.
Which brings us back to Branagh, a usually brilliant actor.  Here, as in
"The Gingerbread Man", he seems to be wandering aimlessly throughout his
settings.  There's no spark or energy to his performance; he merely seems
to be cashing in a paycheque.  Let's hope he works himself out of this rut
soon.  It would be a genuine shame if he spent the rest of his career
making unfocused garbage like "The Proposition".

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Starring Jared Leto, Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Joshua Jackson, Robert
Englund
"Urban Legend" is the latest film in the newly created genre, the "teen
horror/suspense movie", following "Scream", "Disturbing Behaviour", and
"I Know What You Did Last Summer".  I don't think the word "horror" should
even be used to describe these films, though.  To call them horror movies
would imply that they are scary.  They most decidedly are not.  The
contain elements that make the viewer "jump", yes, but they do not contain
any images that linger with the viewer for days afterwards, as a truly
scary movie will do.
The setup for "Urban Legend" is a rather intriguing one.  Some lunatic is
offing students at an American university in the style of famous urban
legends.  These are stories we've all heard, but have likely never
actually happened to a real person.  A premise like that would appear to
be foolproof, but the director, Jamie Blanks, has disproven that theory. 
He creates absolutely no sense of atmosphere, and nothing in this movie
gave me chills.  Sure it's competently directed, but imagine what a
director like David Fincher could have done with a script like this.  
As for the performances, there's nothing too special here.  Jared Leto has
the presence of a dead chicken.  Joshua Jackson steals all the scenes he is
in, but he vacates the picture after the first 20 minutes.  Alicia Witt
never convinced me she was actually scared, even when she was being chased
by a psycho with an axe.  And finally, Robert Englund, "Freddy" himself,
has a small part as a professor that teaches a class on (what a surprise!)
urban legends.  He's good, but is not given much to do.
I will say this for the movie, though.  When the killer was finally
revealed, it was someone I had not even considered as a suspect.  That's
not entirely true, however.  During the 100 minute running time of the
film, anyone who is more than an extra is made to be a suspect.  I guess I
did like that aspect of the movie; the fact that I was constantly
guessing. 
"Urban Legend" isn't all bad, really.  It's just not scary, and that
offends me since it's being marketed as a horror film.  But it is
entertaining all the way through, and it kept me guessing, so I'll
recommend it if a better movie is sold out.
-- 
David Nusair                                      dnusair@chat.carleton.ca
Come visit my "Reel Film Reviews" site! "http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair" 

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey, J.T. Walsh
"The Negotiator" is the best movie, alongside "The Truman Show", I have
seen this summer.  It is intelligent and well-acted and does not feature
any comets or asteroids or lizards, just a expertly crafted storyline and
some of the best acting you're likely to see in any action movie.
The movie is about an expert hostage negotiator (played by Samuel L.
Jackson) who finds himself being framed for murder by an unknown source. 
He thinks he can find some answers in the office of an Internal Affairs
officer (very nicely played by J.T. Walsh) and ends up taking the place
hostage.  Being a hotage negotiator, he "knows the rules of engagement"
and, as his first demand, requests a negotiator of his own choosing (Kevin
Spacey).  Much of the remainder of the film involves Spacey and Jackson
talking to each other on the phone, trying to work the situation out.
Now, from my description, this movie may sound like a standard hostage
taking plot, along the lines of "Dog Day Afternoon", but it's not.  It's
really so much more.  For one thing, there's the brilliant performances of
Jackson and Spacey, two actors at the top of their game.  Jackson hits
just the right note as a man who's innocent, but not afraid to do whatever
it takes to clear his name.  Spacey plays an imperfect hero, if he can be
called that, who constantly finds himself trying to assert his authority
over cops and FBI agents who want to end the situation quickly, but
violently. 
Without a good script, the performances would have been worthless.  That
is not the case here.  The dialogue comes off as realistic and, more
importantly, not just as words the screenwriter might have thought would
"sound good".  For example, there is a scene early on in the film in which
Jackson and his partner are sitting in a parked car talking, and a fellow
police officer interrupts them.  The following exchange between the three
of them felt real, and not just like something a writer might have
throught police officers sound like.  Sure, it's a small thing, but it's
also very important.  
The ending is a bit of a letdown, though.  I won't spoil it, but let's
just say that everything is wrapped up a little too nicely.  The
revelations that come during the final few minutes all arrive in a way
that seemed, to me, way too conveniant.  It's as if the writer had painted
himself into a corner, and couldn't think of an original way to get out. 
The real surprise of the film is J.T. Walsh, in a complex role that a
lesser actor would likely have been unable to pull off.  He gives such a
subtle performance as the internal affairs officer who may or may not know
more than he lets on.  He is able to say with merely a glance what most
actors can't say with a whole page of dialogue.  Sadly, this is his last
film.  He died last year of a heart attack.  He was a profound talent, and
this film is a fitting showcase for his talent.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Featuring the voices of Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis Dreyfuss
Despite the fact that other animated bug movie was released just two short
months ago, I was quite looking forward to "A Bug's Life".  It's Pixar's
sophomore effort following the brilliant "Toy Story" and much of the same
talent behind the scenes is the same.  Alas, "A Bug's Life" does not live
up to "Toy Story", nor is it as good as "Antz".
The movie is about an over-eager ant named Flik (voiced by Foley) who gets
his colony in trouble with a dangerous gang of grasshoppers, led by the
appropriately named Hopper (Spacey).  Flik comes up with a plan to leave
the colony and find other insects to fight the evil grasshoppers.  He
mistakenly hires a ragtag bunch of circus performers, but this being a
Disney movie, they eventually come together and do right by the colony.
The biggest problem with "A Bug's Life" is that it seems to have been made
with a very limited audience in mind; the kids.  Young children under the
age of 10 will likely enjoy this film the most, but anyone older than that
will probably find themselves waiting for it to end.  The movie starts off
well enough, with an intelligent first act, but it's downhill from there. 
The last half-hour consists of one action sequence after another, which
really got tiresome after a while.
Another problem is that there are no strong main characters.  Look at "Toy
Story".  Buzz Lightyear and Woody the cowboy are about as vivid as
characters get.  In "A Bug's Life", what do we have?  Flik?  Well, he's
not very interesting, and he's kind of a wimp.  And then there's the
circus troupe, and while they do provide comic relief, none of them really
stand out on their own.  So we're left with no one person to root for.
However, the animation in this movie is simply *dazzling*.  There's no
other word to describe it.  The computer animation in "A Bug's Life" is
far better than the animation in "Antz".  I was literally stunned by the
first shot of the film, which features a panoramic view of the ant colony
from the air.  I remember thinking that it really looked real, and didn't
look at all like computer animation.
So, "A Bug's Life" is worth seeing simply for the breathtaking animation,
but if you're expecting a story and characters of the same calibre as "Toy
Story", you'll be left disappointed.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
Starring Jamie Lee Curtis, Donald Sutherland, Billy Baldwin
"Virus" is a monster movie without a monster.  Any movie with a hurdle
that large to overcome had better be pretty damn good otherwise.  Sadly,
"Virus" does not deliver, on any level.
The movie opens with the Russian space station Mir about to transmit
something (we never find out what) to a big boat with lots of satellites
on it.  Sudddenly, a wave of colorful lightning comes flying through
space, and winds up destroying Mir and using it to transmit itself to the
aforementioned big boat.  Cut to seven days later, we meet Donald
Sutherland and his band of seafaring vultures.  See, they spend all their
time sailing around looking for dead-in-the-water ships to rescue, and
then collect the reward money.  At least, I *think* that's what they do. 
Along with many other things in the film, their reason for being out in
the middle of the ocean isn't really explained.
So, they stumble upon this big boat with lots of satellites on it, and
decide to haul it back to Russian waters.  The only problem is, the crew
starts disappearing one-by-one and turning into Borg.  Yes, Borg. 
Complete with the red laser beam in place of an eye.  Apparently, this
alien lifeform can only survive if inside something electrical.  So, it
creates make-shift machines and uses humans for "spare parts".  
Blah, blah, blah.  I could go on forever describing the ludicrous
so-called plot, but I won't.  Suffice it to say the most original thing
about this movie is having Donald Sutherland play an Irish man (!). 
Everything else in this movie has been taken from other (better) movies. 
For example, many of the machines resemble those found in the little-seen
Japanese movie, "Tetsuo-The Iron Man".  And the plot is right out of
"Aliens".  
The funny thing is, I was actually expecting to enjoy this movie.  I have
a soft spot for cheesy monster movies, like last years under-appreciated
"Deep Rising".  But "Virus", as I mentioned earlier, doesn't even have a
monster.  It just has a big pile of circuits and wires and expects the
audience to fear this ridiculous looking contraption.  
"Virus" is the type of movie that really makes you wonder what the
screenwriter was thinking about when he wrote it.  Besides the lame
"monster", it's chock full of dialogue that no real person would ever say,
and situations that no real person would ever allow themselves to get
into.  For example, there is a scene late in the movie in which one of
the characters actually attempts to *negotiate* with the alien!  Now, I
don't know about you, but if I came upon a lifeform that viewed mankind as
a virus to be eliminated, I doubt that I would attempt to reason with it. 
That makes about as much sense as a baby squirrel calmly asking a fierce
predator to spare his life.
Finally, "Virus" isn't scary.  The least the filmmakers could have done
was to make the movie just a little scary.  As it is, it's about as
frightening as a box of cookies.
Skip "Virus".  If it's a cool monster movie you want, rent the far
superior (and the granddaddy of this genre) "Aliens".

Title
Review for Sour Grapes (1998)
Starring Stephen Weber, Craig Bierko
"Sour Grapes", newly released on video, is Larry David's directorial 
debut.  Larry David, for those of you not in the know, is the co-creator 
of Seinfeld and also the man responsible for writing many of the most 
classic episodes of that sitcom, including the infamous "Contest" episode.  
Knowing that, one would expect that "Sour Grapes" would reach new heights 
in hilarity.  Well, this does not exactly happen, but it is one of the 
funnier movies of the year.
The film stars Stephen Weber (from Wings) and Craig Bierko as cousins; 
one is a doctor, the other is a designer of running shoes.  Along with 
their respective girlfriends, they spontaneously decide to head to 
Atlantic City for a night of gambling and quote hotel sex.  Needless 
to say, they both find themselves broke quite quickly.  Just before 
giving up, they decide to spend their last few quarters on the slots.  
At the machines, their luck is equally bad, until one of them hits the 
big jackpot and wins 400 thousand dollars.  There's only one problem.  
He won with two quarters the other lent him.  The rest of the film has 
the two cousins fighting over the money, with often wacky, sitcom-like 
results.
I hope my cynical tone doesn't give you the impression that I disliked 
the film.  Quite the opposite, actually.  While not consistently funny, 
it's never boring.  The films strong suit is it's actors, particularly 
Stephen Weber and Craig Bierko as the fuedin' cousins.  They're so 
gleefully over-the-top, you can't help but laugh at their nutty antics.  
Weber, in particular, was a surprise.  After hitting it big with Wings, 
he didn't really seem to do anything.  "Sour Grapes" essentially returns 
him to his area of expertise, sitcoms.  The movie plays like an overlong 
pilot for a sitcom.  Don't get me wrong, that's not a bad thing.  
Especially when someone as talented as Larry David is involved.
As a person who was quite dismayed when Seinfeld went off the air earlier 
this year, I had quite high expectations for this movie.  Seinfeld has 
been the only sitcom that has ever made me laugh as consistently as it 
did, and most of the funniest episodes were in fact written by David.  
And seeing as though David is credited as the sole writer for Sour 
Grapes, one would expect that the joke to laugh ratio would be quite high.  
While there are several moments I found myself laughing outloud, there are 
too many instances in which the plot gets in the way.  David keeps 
throwing in more and more ludicrious hoops for his characters to jump 
through, and I got a little tired of it after a while.  I would have 
liked it if he could have done what made his show so famous, and made the 
movie mostly about "nothing".  David's strong suit is his dialogue, so 
he should have included more dialogue-driven scenes, and less gimmicky 
plot devices.
Those familiar with David's work on Seinfeld will likely have a good time 
spotting the similarities between the two.  For one thing, David includes 
classical music into a number of scenes, including the very same piece 
that was heard in Seinfeld's "Barber" episode.  Also, a prominent 
character in the film is Beirko's domineering, exaggeratingly Jewish 
mother, which is very similiar to George's mother on Seinfeld.
"Sour Grapes" may not be the funniest movie of the year, that honor goes 
to the vastly underrated "BASEketball", but it's always entertaining, and 
in the end, isn't that really all that matters?

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Starring Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Seth Green, Jason Lee, Jon Voight
Will Smith can be a charistmatic actor.  In "The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air",
his NBC sitcom that ran for seven years, he was always engaging and funny.
In his breakthrough movie role from "Independence Day", he was essentially
playing the same character as his sitcom, but he was engaging and the
audience was rooting for him.  Now, with "Enemy of the State", Smith is
trying to become a Real Actor, and quite frankly, he doesn't have the
talent for it.
I don't want to be one of those critics that needlessly slags actors, but
I'm afraid that it is a necessary evil in this case.  Smith just isn't
convincing in his role as a D.C. attourney on the run from nefarious
government agents.  He always seems to be going through the motions.  And,
worst of all, he has virtually no screen presence.  Whenever he's on
screen, the viewer doesn't feel compelled to watch him, and when you're
the star of the film, that's deadly.  Imagine how riveting this movie
could have been had a talented young actor like Edward Norton taken
Smith's role.
Despite Smith's awkward and unconvincing performance, "Enemy of the State"
isn't all bad.  There are some great, heart-pounding action scenes that
had me on the "edge of my seat".  Tony Scott, who's previous credits
include "Crimson Tide" and "Top Gun", is a master at filming fast-paced
action sequences.  And unlike Michael Bay, director of this summer's awful
"Armageddon", he doesn't feel the need to include thousands of cuts.  He
understands that fast cuts do not always equal fast action.  Bay could
surely take a lesson from Scott, since their styles are so similar.
Alongside the good action sequences, there are some decent actors here,
particuarly Gene Hackman.  Hackman has long been one of my favorites, and
he delivers another brilliant performance.  He blows Smith away every time
he is on screen.  Perhaps they should have gotten a lesser actor to make
Smith look good, because as it is, Hackman reminds the audience of what a
good actor can do with lesser material.
And it is lesser material.  The script, while interestingly plotted,
contains simply *horrible* dialogue.  Smith's character is constantly
wisecracking, even in situations that no sane man could make light of. 
And the ending is a complete cop-out.  It's as if David Marconi, the
screenwriter, had painted himself into a corner with all these different
characters, he didn't know what to do.  I won't spoil it, but let's just
say that the movie ends exactly the same way Scott's "True Romance" did. 
One final complaint:  Gabriel Byrne.  Here is an excellent actor reduced
to a three minute cameo as an assassin.  Even in his miniscule part, he
manages to exude more charisma than Smith manages in the entire two hour
running time.  What a waste.
"Enemy of the State" is a not-too-boring diversion, but given all the
talent involved, both behind the camera and in front, it's a real
disappointment.

Title
Review for Last Night (1998)
Starring Don McKellar, Callum Keith Rennie, Sandra Oh
"Last Night" could have an "AKA" tagged on the end of it that says, "It's
the end of the world, and we feel fine".  
"Last Night" is about just that.  The last night of planet earth's
existence.  The world is going to end at precisely midnight, January 1st,
2000.  How scientists were so accurately able to predict when this
catastrophic event would occur is never explained.  Nor is the event
itself.  Throughout the entire movie, no explanation is given as to why
this is happening.  In doing this, McKellar (who also wrote and directed
the film) seems to be trying to transcend the genre.  He's attempted to
make a film about people, and how each of them deals with their last night
of life.  The film contains no science fiction elements, which allows the
viewer to concentrate on the feelings and actions of the characters. 
McKellar is largely successful in his attempt to rise above his material. 
The film is set in Toronto, and follows several people in their various
escapades on the last night of existence.  There's McKellar, who plays a
man who just wants to be alone when the moment occurs, but keeps getting
interrupted by a woman (Sandra Oh) in search of her husband.  Her husband,
played by David Cronenberg, is spending the day working at the gas
company, informing people that they will attempt to keep providing gas
right up until the end.  Finally, there's McKellar's friend, played by
Callum Keith Rennie, a man who has spent his final months trying out every
sexual perversion you can think of.
McKellar has crafted a gang of the some of the most interesting characters
I've seen in a film in months.  These people all felt real to me,
especially the character played by Sandra Oh.  We can see her desperation,
her utter need to be with her husband in the final hours.  Rennie is good,
too, as the man who wants to literally try everything before he dies.  He
exudes such charm and likeablity, it's not surprising that we're rooting
for him to get what he wants.  But for me, the biggest surprise in the
movie is McKellar.  I knew that he was a talented director, but I had no
idea he could act as well.  His insistence to be alone, much to the dismay
of his parents, is something that most people would find difficult to
understand, but as played by McKellar, we can understand his reasons.  He
doesn't buy into the whole notion that just because everyone's going to
die, he should immediately find some companionship.  He realizes the
relationship would be forced, and they would only be together for the sake
of being together.  McKellar gives a brilliant performance, and I hope he
alternates between directing and acting.
My only quibble with the film is that we never find out why the world is
ending.  I really wanted to know, and my need to know was hanging over the
film at all times.  I appreciate the fact that McKellar didn't want the
material to rule the film, and that he wanted the movie to be more of a
study in human behavious.  However, in not telling the audience what the
cause of earth's destruction is, he's left a big question that is in their
minds throughout the film.  Another problem is we never see anybody
panicking.  I would imagine if the world was ending, and there was nothing
to be done about it, a large segment of the population would be going out
of their minds.  Instead, we are treated to shots of a giant crowd
partying like it's New Year's Eve.  I just didn't buy the fact that
everyone had completely accepted their fate.  No one had the urge to "rage
against the dying of the light".
Despite these small problems, "Last Night" is one of the best movies of
the year.  As opposed to the moronic "Armageddon", "Last Night" treats the
subject at hand with maturity and believabilty.  And Bruce Willis never
shows up to save the day.
-- 
David Nusair                                      dnusair@chat.carleton.ca
Come visit my "Reel Film Reviews" site! "http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair" 

Title
Review for Girl Gets Moe, The (1997)
"Love to Kill" starts off aimlessly and gets progressively less coherent
as time passes.  At the outset, the movie appears to be about Tony Danza,
who's an illegal distributor of guns, trying to establish a relationship
with an unsuspecting woman.  Danza sets up a double date with her, her
sister, and a collegue of his.  Everything seems to be going well, until
the sister accidentally dies by falling down a set of stairs.  Much
confusion and mahem ensues, as the death is covered up and other
associates of Danza's begin to emerge, all after one thing or another. 
Sound confusing?  It is.  I think what the filmmakers were trying to do is
take the standard crime movie and throw in a little humour and levity.  In
some respects, it works.  But the majority of the film is a convoluted and
confusing mess.  Characters keep popping up with no explanation, demanding
money for deals that occur off-screen.  The only aspect of the movie that
actually works is the budding relationship between Danza and the dead
woman's sister.  But so little time is devoted to this part of the story,
we never really become too familiar with these characters, and because of
this, we don't really care what happens to them.  Well, I didn't, at
least. 
One thing I will give the movie is that it's a complete departure for Tony
Danza.  Here's a guy, because of his many sitcom roles, who's ingrained in 
the consciousness as a nice guy who always does the right thing.  Here, he
plays a man who's just looking out for himself, and if that means he needs
to kill in order to save his own skin, so be it.  I was very impressed by
his performance, and within minutes of the start of the film, I had
forgotten all about his good-guy persona.  Michael Madsen is also good as
an associate of Danza's who spends half the movie buddying up to him and
the other half trying to kill him.  Like I said, it's not exactly a linear
storyline.
"Love to Kill" should be praised for trying to do something different with
the well worn crime genre, but it's just too bad that the story doesn't
really add up to much.  The stars deserved better, and so did the
audience. 

Title
Review for Call Northside 777 (1948)
Whenever I sit down to watch a Jimmy Stewart film, I always have the
expectation that I'm going to thoroughly enjoy myself.  Stewart always
manages to rise above his material, even when it's bottom-of-the-barrel
stuff.  Not that that tends to happen, though, because somehow Stewart
always managed to pick the most engaging and entertaining scripts. Not so
with "Call Northside 777".
The movie casts Stewart as a not-too-ambitious reporter assigned to cover
the execution of a death-row inmate accused of murder.  The prisoner says
that he's innocent, but Stewart (initially) does not believe him. 
Eventually, though, after reviewing the facts and speaking to a number of
people close to the prisoner, he begins to believe him and starts his own
investigation.
Intriguing premise, right?  There's no way a filmmaker could go wrong with
a setup like that, and Jimmy Stewart in the lead, right?  Wrong.  "Call
Northside 777" is an overlong bore.  For some reason, *every* single scene
in the film goes on much longer than they need to.  And to make things
worse, the movie is presented to us in a quasi-documentary style, so all
the dialogue is extremely dry and without humour.
Another problem with is that everything is over-explained to the max.  For
example, there is a scene in which the prisoner is hooked up to a
lie-detector.  Now, since most audiences in 1948 likely had no idea what a
lie-detector machine was, the characters spend far too much time
explaining how it works.  We even see the machine being calibrated for the
prisoner, a process that takes about five minutes.  Was it really
necessary to show all this?  I don't think so.  This ten minute scene
could have easily been cut in half.  And there are other examples of
scenes that run on much longer than they need to.
At the beginning of this review, I mentioned how Jimmy Stewart is always
good in his movies.  Sadly, this is not so here.  None of his usual charm
is present.  Instead, he plays the character very somberly, I suppose
because it's based on a true story.  Stewart looks like he's trapped in
this role.  You can see, ever-so-briefly, moments in which his engaging
personality bubbles to the surface, but these moments are very sparse.
"Call Northside 777" could have been an exciting, tension-filled thriller.
Instead, it's technically flawless, but there's no heart.

Title
Review for Fille seule, La (1995)
"A Single Girl" is filmed in real-time, which means that every minute of
the first hour and 15 minutes of this movie is accounted for.  I
ordinarily like real-time movies.  "Nick of Time", the vastly underrated
Johnny Depp thriller, was exciting and fun.  "A Single Girl", however, is
boring and uninteresting.
Ledoyen stars as a woman who has just found out she's pregnant, and is
starting work at a hotel that same day.  We see her with her boyfriend at
a cafe, and at the hotel.  Those are the only two locations seen during
much of the movie.  
The problem I had with it being filmed in real-time is that Ledoyen is the
focus of the movie.  This means we are treated to many shots of her
walking.  Walking down a corridor in the hotel.  Walking to and from the
cafe.  Walking while she smokes.  I would guess that if you were to
fast-forward all the scenes where there is no talking, just walking, you'd
be left with a very short movie.
Ledoyen, though, gives a great performance.  As with most foreign movies I
watch, I didn't know or recognize any of the stars in it.  Since the
entire movie rests on the shoulders of Ledoyen, the quality of her
performance had better be good.  And it is.  She's very charismatic and
yet also aloof at the same time.  I liked her as a character, I just wish
she had been in a better movie.
I've read a few other reviews comparing "A Single Girl" to some of the
French New Wave films of the early 60's.  I suppose I can see that, but "A
Single Girl" doesn't have the energy found in many of those films.  It
mostly just trods along, aimlessly wandering to its final destination,
which isn't even that interesting.  
Skip "A Single Girl" and rent "Breathless" instead.

Title
Review for Showdown at Boot Hill (1958)
"Showdown at Boot Hill" presents Charles Bronson doing what he does best: 
kicking ass.  Ever since I first became aware of Bronson, through the
"Death Wish" series, I'm always on the look-out for his films.  He has a
great screen presence, and you're always rooting for him.
In "Showdown at Boot Hill", Bronson plays a bounty hunter in the old West
who shows up at a small town to pick up a criminal.  The criminal refuses
to go, and draws his gun.  Of course, this being a Bronson movie, ol'
Chuck shoots him dead.  The only problem is this particular criminal had a
lot of friends, and nobody will admit it was actually him, thus preventing
Bronson from collecting his bounty.  So, he hangs around the town, waiting
for someone to come forward, while falling in love with the local spinster
in the process.
While there's nothing terribly original about the story, the Bronson's
performance more than makes up for it.  He plays a man who knows that he's
doing the right thing, but also knows that people around him mistrust his
motives.  Bounty hunters were not thought too highly of back then, but
somebody had to do it, I suppose.  
>From the instant he comes on screen, the audience is always on Bronson's
side.  We want him to succeed in his "mission", as it were, and we also
want him to find love with the lonely waitress at the local bar.  That's
what makes Bronson one of the true icons of American cinema.  He has that
rare quality that allows him to appear tough when he needs to, but also
sensitive around his friends and lovers.
Like Clint Eastwood, he's a true "man's man".  I only hope that he has not
given up on acting.  It would be a real shame if this legend were to die
without having won an Oscar.

Title
Review for Breed Apart, A (1984)
Starring Rutger Hauer, Powers Boothe, Kathleen Turner
"A Breed Apart" casts Rutger Hauer as a crazy, bird-loving recluse who
picks his feathered friends over Kathleen Turner.  A bit hard to swallow? 
That's only the first of many improbabilities in this film.
Hauer stars as a man obsessed with keeping the birds on his island safe,
while Boothe plays a guy hired to steal a couple of rare eagle eggs by a
rich egg collector.  Turner is the woman caught between the two men.
"A Breed Apart" isn't a bad movie, exactly.  Indeed, I found myself
rooting for both the Hauer and Boothe characters, even though their goals
couldn't be more different.  The problem with the film is that there are
just too many inconsistencies.  For example, early on in the film, Hauer
physically assaults two drunken rednecks shooting at "his" birds.  Later
on, the rednecks come back for revenge with four other people, and Hauer
kills a few of them.  I have a tough time believing that the police
wouldn't get involved at that point.
Another problem is the silly love-triangle that develops.  I didn't care
one way or the other who ended up with Turner.  I was more interested in
finding out which of the two men would be victorious in their respective
missions.  However, despite this uninteresting sub-plot, Turner did manage
to give a great performance as the woman who reminds the two men that
sometimes there's more to life than money and birds.
As for Hauer, he's an actor I've always admired.  He has a penchant for
picking strange and unusual characters.  And this one is no exception. 
He's frequently seen riding around his island on a white horse, wearing
pirate's clothing, and holstering a cross-bow.  Despite all his
eccentric mannerisms, though, Hauer always manages to let the human side
of his character shine through.  For example, there's a scene in which he
barks at Turner and her son because they came onto his island a day early.
He comes off as crazy loner in that scene, but a few minutes later, he is
apologizing to Turner, and we believe his intentions.  Soon after, we find
out he's a Vietnam vet, and his actions become fairly clear to us.
"A Breed Apart" isn't a great movie by any means, but it does contain good
performances by all three leads, and it's worth seeing for that reason
alone. 

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
Starring Val Kilmer, Mira Sorvino, Nathan Lane
What must it be like to be blind?  Never being able to physically see
anything, always touching for some semblance of that sensation.  I respect
blind people just because they're able to get through every single day
despite such a huge hurdle to overcome.
In "At First Sight", Val Kilmer plays such a person.  Blind since the age
of three, he's just as competent as anyone else, provided he's familiar
with his surroundings.  He's employed as a masseuse at the local spa, he
has lots of friends, and a sister who loves him and cares for him.  All
this changes, though, when he meets a vacationing architect, played by
Mira Sorvino.  They fall in love, and she changes his life.  She moves him
to New York and introduces him to a doctor who promises him his sight
through a radical new operation.  He accepts, and finds himself thrust
into the world of the seeing.  Nathan Lane enters the picture as a "sight
therapist" who helps Kilmer understand what he's seeing.
"At First Sight" contains the restoration of sight to a blind man, but is
more interested in the romance between Kilmer and Sorvino.  And that's the
major flaw of the movie.  Not that Kilmer and Sorvino don't make an
enjoyable and engaging couple; in fact, their chemistry is instantly
believable.  
No, the problem with "At First Sight" is that the filmmakers seem to think
that we would prefer to witness endless scenes of Kilmer and Sorvino
frolicking in parks, ice rinks, etc.  I found the concept of restoring
vision to a blind man to be fascinating, and was quite disappointed to
come to the realization, around an hour into the movie, that Kilmer and
Sorvino's romance was going to dominate the film.
Not nearly enough time is spent on Kilmer's adjustment to sight.  I'd say
it takes him about 15 minutes of screen time to get acclimitized to the
world of the seeing.  I would have liked to have seen a lot more of this
process, and I especially would have liked to have seen more Nathan Lane. 
He's the stand-out here, and it's too bad that his part is such a minor
element of the movie.
"At First Sight" isn't a bad movie by any means.  It's just a
disappointing one.

Title
Review for Bang (1995)
"Bang", filmed on a budget of $20 000, is proof that a big budget
is not necessarily needed to produce a quality motion picture.
The movie opens with a young woman being kicked out of her house
for failing to pay her rent.  She's not too concerned, though,
as she is scheduled to audition for the leading role in a movie
opposite "Dustin" and "Julia".  However, when she arrives at 
the producers house, it is quickly made quite apparent that his 
only motive for asking her there is to sleep with her.  She 
refuses his advances and is thrown out without haste.  Outside,
she bumps into a somewhat insane homeless man (played very well
by Peter Greene), who starts literally trashing the street.
He exits, and leaves the woman to be arrested by a police officer
who offers to drop all the charges in exchange for "sexual
favours".  She grabs his gun, handcuffs him to a tree, and steals
his uniform.  The remainder of the film follows her exploits as
she roams the streets of Los Angeles dressed as a cop.
"Bang" is one of those films that, while not heavy on plot, it
always keeps you interested, just because you want to see what's
going to happen next.  Through the main characters eyes, we get
to see both the perks (free coffee) and downsides (the 
responsibility of the job) that come with being a police officer.
The film has been shot in a kind of pseudo-documentary style, 
with a hand-held camera following the characters around.  Whether
this was a conscious decision by the director, Ash, or a budget-
induced constraint does not really matter; the technique gives
the movie a realistic feel. . .almost as though this actually
happened.  And on that same note, there isn't one performance
here that doesn't ring true.  Even the smallest roles have been
filled by actors who seem real.  It's not often you see a movie
in which no-name actors actually do better than mainstream
Hollywood actors would.
"Bang" is a movie that needs to be seen by Hollywood producers.
It just goes to show that you don't need a gargantuan budget
to create a good movie; you just need qualified actors and a
well-written script.

Title
Review for Return of the Texas Chainsaw Massacre, The (1994)
Starring Matthew McConaughey, Renee Zellwegger
I'm going to start this review off with a hypothetical question.  Let's
say you've just been in a car accident, and the driver of the other
vehicle is unconscious.  Your friends have left to go get help, and you're
waiting to see if the victim wakes up.  A tow-truck comes along, and the
driver hops out of the truck to see what's going on.  He then proceeds to
kill the unconscious victim by snapping his neck.  Do you:
A) Run away screaming for your life, staying away from the main road,
B) Run away (but not too fast) and stay on the main road even when the
   madman in the truck starts following you, *stop* to catch your breath, 
   try to negotiate with the psycho, and when that fails, start running
   away again, all the while *staying on the main road*?
If you answered "a", you are far more intelligent than the screenwriter of
"Texas Chainsaw Massacre: The Next Generation" and will likely hate this
movie.  However, if you answered "b", prepare to enjoy a film made with
idiots like you in mind!
"Texas Chainsaw Massacre: The Next Generation" is being called a sequel,
but it's really more of a remake of the original.  There's a few changes
here and there, but it's essentially the same (even the infamous
"meathook" scene has been re-created.)  The story opens with four
teenagers hitting the road on the night of their prom, and somehow ending
up in the middle of nowhere.  Needless to say, they soon encounter
Leatherface and his nutty family.  Much carnage ensues.
To call this movie inept would be putting it mildly.  In addition to the
laughably idiotic situation I mentioned in my hypothetical question, there
is a moment towards the end of the film where one of the baddies is killed
by an airplane that literally comes out of nowhere.  It just swoops down
and kills him with its wheel.  No explantion is given as to who was flying
it or why he/she is going around killing people with the planes wheel.
The dialogue is even more atrocious.  Zellwegger, who is kidnapped by "the
family" early on, keeps trying to have normal conversations with these
people.  When you're surrounded by maniacs wielding chainsaws and dead
corpses, I would think that rationality would go out the window.  Speaking
of going out the window, there is a scene in which Zellwegger jumps out a
window.  Apparently, the stunt double had a little trouble, because she
visibly gets stuck in the window.  The director quickly cuts to a wide
shot where the stunt double *doesn't* get caught in the window.  This was
one of many glaring inconsistencies.  There are so many, in fact, that if
I were to name them all, this review would be several pages long.
The only reason I am giving this movie one star instead of no stars is
because of Matthew McConaughey.  He plays a member of "the family" with a
hydraulic leg (home-made, I might add) and is so completely over-the-top,
you can't help but be amazed by his performance.  He obviously had a lot
of fun with this part, and it really shows.  He makes Jack Nicholson's
portrayal of the psychotic inn keeper in "The Shining" look restrained in
comparison.
For a horror movie, "Texas Chainsaw Massacre: The Next Generation"
contains surprisingly little gore.  In fact, in contains none.  There's a
little blood here and there, but that's as far as it goes.  Which leads me
to believe that the budget must have been *astonishingly* low, and it
shows.  Everything about the movie looks cheap, from the sets to the
costumes.  Especially Leatherface.  Once frightening and nightmare
inducing, he's now as terrifying as Dame Edna.
Do yourself a favor and take a pass at this remake.  Check out the far
superior original instead.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
Meet Joe Black (Reviewed on Nov. 27/98)
Starring Brad Pitt, Anthony Hopkins, Claire Forlani
In "Meet Joe Black", Brad Pitt plays Death.  
That's all that really needs to be said, but nevertheless, I will provide
the three of you that have seemingly been living in a cave with a plot
description.  Death decides to take a holiday, what with all the rigors of
soul-collecting and all, and forces Anthony Hopkins into showing him what
it's like to be human.  Death assumes the body of Brad Pitt, and from
there, much trouble ensues.
For one thing, Death-as-Pitt falls in love with Hopkins daughter, played
by Claire Forlani.  Obviously this enrages Hopkins, because really, what
can Death offer?  Besides eternal damnation, of course.  There is also a
sub-plot about Forlani's ex-boyfriend (she dumps him for Pitt) trying to
take over Hopkins company.
"Meet Joe Black" runs just under three hours.  I've always thought that
such obscene running times should be limited to historical epics.  "Meet
Joe Black" is neither historical nor is it an epic, though I get the
feeling Martin Brest (the director) desperately wants it to be.  Every
single scene in the movie goes on about 3-4 minutes too long.  And the
ending takes about 20 minutes longer than it really should.  A severe
editing job could have made this movie excellent, instead of just good,
which is what it is.
Pitt, an actor I normally loathe, is actually quite engaging as Death.  I
believed his performance, and I could see why Forlani's character would
fall in love with him.  I have to agree with Roger Ebert, though, who
found it hard to believe that an entity that's been around for all time
wouldn't know what peanut butter was.  That has nothing to do with Pitt's
performance, of course, but it is a little distracting.
Hopkins gives his usual excellent performance.  He's able to portray the
angst of a man who knows he has very little time left, without making him
an obnoxious whiner.  And in her first major studio role, Claire Forlani
is surprisingly good.  She has a sweet tenderness that allows the audience
to instantly root for her.  
So, "Meet Joe Black" is a good movie hampered by it's ridiculous running
time.  Had the film been cut by an hour or so, I have no doubt that I
would be calling it one of the best movies of the year in this review.

Title
Review for American Perfekt (1997)
Starring Robert Forster, Amanda Plummer
When Robert Forster found himself famous again after appearing in "Jackie
Brown", he immediately signed up for a little film called "American
Perfekt".  This was almost two years ago.  I waited patiently for the film
to be released, but it never was.  Finally, I forgot about it.  The other
day, though, while I was perusing the selection of the local video store,
I stumbled upon, you guessed it, "American Perfekt".  I immediately rented
it and with a certain amount of glee, rushed home to view it.  Having now
seen the film, I understand why it never saw theatrical release.
"American Perfekt" is a jumbled mess.  The storyline is non-existent.  It
took me half the movie just to figure out what was going on.  And at that
point, the only thing I really knew for sure was that the movie was
*never* going to introduce a plot of some sort.  It wants to get by on
quirkyness and so-called charm alone, and it just doesn't work.
Robert Forster plays a psychiatrist who picks up Amanda Plummer, and they
head off on the road together.  Along the way to no discernable
destination, they run into all sorts of kooky and wacky characters.  I
suppose this free-wheeling, no plot style is supposed to give the film an
element of danger and excitment, but all it did was make me sleepy.  I'm
all for trying new things within the realm of film, but not at the expense
of coherence.  Nothing in this movie makes sense.  The actions of the
characters go unexplained, even when they're truly bizarre.  I'll give you
an example, without giving too much away.  David Thewlis has a part as a
drifting con-man.  At one point, mid-way through the movie, he runs
Forster and Plummer off the road with his car.  As he passes them, we see
that his face is covered in blood.  Do you think we would get an
explanation as to what happened to him?  You would think so, wouldn't 
you.
"American Perfekt" is a waste of time.  Nothing is gained from watching
this movie, except maybe a migraine.  And if you do rent it, don't bother
trying to figure out what's going on in the hopes that everything will be
resolved by the end.  This doesn't happen.
And no explanation is given for the misspelling of "perfect", either.
-- 
David Nusair                                http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair"As I have pointed out before, Andre Rousimoff's portrayal of a giant in
"The Princess Bride", Richard Dawson's portrayal of an obnoxious game show
host in "The Running Man", and Courtney Love's portrayal of a junkie hooker
in "The People vs Larry Flynt"."
        -R. Wiley on the all-time biggest Oscar snubs

Title
Review for Naked Spur, The (1953)
Is Jimmy Stewart the greatest actor of all-time?  It's quite possible. 
His career spanned over 40 years, and he acted in more movies than most
actors ever could.  Yet, when he is talked about in the media, he is
generally thought of as an actor who played one type of role: the nice
guy.  And that's really a shame.  "The Naked Spur" features Jimmy Stewart
in a role completely different than what people would expect from him.
It's a western, which Stewart specialized in around this period, and it
casts him as a desperate man out to collect a bounty on a man who used to
be his friend.  Before he finds that man, though, he runs into two men who
agree to help him, thinking he is a Sheriff.  When the criminal is
eventually caught, the two men discover Stewart's secret, and decide they
want a piece of the action too.  The rest of the film is a suspenseful
journey in which each man suspects the other constantly.
Also featured is the woman travelling with the criminal, well played by
Janet Leigh.  We're never too sure who's side she's really on until the
end.  Leigh is an actress probably best known for her role as the "shower
lady" from "Psycho", and that's unfair.  She gives a strong performance as
a woman who is pulled between these two men.
Stewart gives a performance unlike anything I've ever seen from him.  He
usually keeps cool no matter what occurs, but here, he gets downright
hysterical at times.  I think perhaps he took this role to prove to the
public that he was more than just a "nice guy".  His performance borders
on psychotic at times, but I loved watching every second of it.  It's
roles like this one that make me admire him as much as I do.  He was an
actor unafraid to take chances, and even ruin his public image.

Title
Review for Marido perfecto, El (1992)
"The Perfect Husband" is an odd little movie.  I've looked it up in all my
movie-resource books, including Maltin, and none of them have a listing
for it.  Even the always reliable Internet Movie Database does not contain
one review for it.  It has a major star (Tim Roth), so I wonder what
happened to it during its release.
No matter.  It's an entertaining film about a womanizing opera singer in
the 19th century, who finds himself falling in love with a woman he cannot
have.  Naturally, the womanizer is played by Roth.  This is the type of
role he excels at; the cocky, self-sure boor who is brought down a few
pegs before the film ends.  He's great in the film, as are the supporting
actors.
There's not much plot here, though.  The movie basically follows the Roth
character through a few days of his life, and that's it.  We don't really
get a sense of what he's about.  We just know that he's a ladies man that
is used to playing the field, without ever letting himself become attached
to any one woman.
Also, there's no real reason that the film needs to take place in the
1800's.  Everything that occurs in the movie could easily happen in the
90's, with one exception.  Roth prides himself on having survived 29
duels.  These duels would come about when the husbands of the women he
would sleep with would find out, and challenge him.  Obviously, this could
not happen now.  Likely, the irate husband would just flat-out shoot him. 
There would be no sense of gentlemanly conduct, as displayed in the act of
the duel.
"The Perfect Husband" is one of those movies that is instantly
forgettable, but you don't notice until it's over.

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
Starring Christian Slater, Morgan Freeman, Minnie Driver, Randy Quaid
First it was called "The Flood" and now it's called "Hard Rain".  I don't
see much of a difference, but apparently some executives at Paramount
figured that with a title like "The Flood", it might become another
casuality of the "disaster movie flops", a la "Volcano" and "Dante's
Peak". 
Well, whatever you want to call it, it's a pretty good movie.  It's
written by Graham Yost, the guy responsible for the first "Speed" movie. 
"Hard Rain" is very similiar in many respects.  We have the hero who
doesn't really want to be a hero.  We have the love interest, who is much
wiser than she appears to be.  The only thing different, is that "Hard
Rain" doesn't really feature a clear villian, where "Speed" had Dennis
Hopper.  
This isn't a bad thing, really.  I mean, aren't we all sick of the stock
film bad guy?  It's usually some dude with a grudge, and a lot of
ammo/bombs at his disposal.  "Hard Rain" features Morgan Freeman as the
"bad guy", but once we get to know him, we find that he's really not that
bad after all.  He doesn't want to kill anyone, he just wants to get the
money that Christian Slater is responsible for.  It's through a set of
extreme circumstances that his non-violence plan is thrown off course.  To
say more, would really be unfair, because a large part of the enjoyment of
this film are the unexpected surprises along the way.
Christian Slater, recently jailed for beating up his girlfriend, gives a
fair performance as a man who's just trying to do the right thing under
really difficult circumstances.  The real star of the show, however, is
Freeman.  It's really surprising to see him "slumming" in a film like
this, but he does bring an unexpected air of dignity to what would have
otherwise been a standard action flick.
Anyway, while it's no "Speed", "Hard Rain" is a suitably diverting way to
spend an hour and a half.

Title
Review for Traveller (1997)
Starring Bill Paxton, Mark Wahlberg, Julianna Margulies
There's something about watching con men at work that never fails
to fascinate me.  Likely, it's because I know that I would never
be able to pull off a con, no matter how small.  I just don't have
what it takes to look a man straight in the eyes and lie to him.
Many of the characters in "Traveller" have the ability to do that, 
and much more.
The movie stars Bill Paxton as a con man at the top of his game,
and Mark Wahlberg as his young protoge.  They are teamed up when
Paxton sticks up for Wahlberg in front of his people, who refuse to
accept him.  His "people" are gypsies, who rely on con men like 
Paxton to keep the money flowing in.  The movie starts off predictably
with Paxton showing Wahlberg the ropes, but then veers off into 
totally unexpected territory.
"Traveller" is an odd movie in that you never quite know what it's
going to do next.  For a while, you think it's a movie along the
lines of "The Sting", with the older man showing the naive kid the
ropes.  But then it becomes something different, and I think that's
what I liked most about the film.  Too many films today have 
predictable outcomes, and a five year old can usually guess at how
the movie's going to end.  "Traveller" never quite settles into a 
niche, and I was happy to be watching a film that I couldn't quite
put my finger on.
The performances are first rate, with Paxton redeeming himself for
"Twister".  At the outset of the film, we're not too sure if we like
him.  He's taking advantage of innocent people and generally acting
like a bad-ass.  But as the movie progresses, and as he falls in love
with the Julianna Margules character, we start to see a different
side to him emerge.  And to me, this is the sign of a good actor.  
Someone who can make you think one thing, but later on, force you
to re-evaluate what you originally thought.  Wahlberg is good, too,
as a natural-born grifter.
"Traveller" is the type of movie that, after you watch it, you will
likely be suspecting everyone around you of ripping you off for the
next week.  Hey, it beats thinking an asteroid is going to destroy
the earth.

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
Starring Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Stacy Keach, Avery Brooks, Fairuza
Balk, Beverly D'Angelo
It's been two short years since Edward Norton made his his movie debut in
"Primal Fear".  Despite only appearing in a handful of movies since then,
he has proven himself to be one of the best young actors working today. 
He's got a range that is not often seen in actors these days.  In many
ways, he's reminiscent of Sean Penn.  They both instantly draw an audience
in with their charisma, they both have the ability to disappear in their
roles, and most importantly, they are not afraid to tackle difficult
material. 
"American History X" stars Norton as a young skinhead who is living a life
he thinks is just.  A life filled with hatred and crime.  It all changes,
though, when he is arrested for murder and sent to prison for three years.
He comes out a changed man, and attempted to get his family out of that
life permanently, but discovers his younger brother (Furlong) has taken up
the cause.
The movie is told in black and white, and colour.  Tony Kaye, the
director, lays the symbolism on pretty thick.  The black and white is
reserved for the flashbacks, which show Norton in his pre-enlightenment
days.  The lack of colour is supposed to indicate, I guess, that he's not
really living like that.  It's not until he realizes that racism is wrong,
that the colours of the world open up to him.  Either that, or it was just
a tool to clarify for the audience what was a flashback and what was the
present.
The problem with the movie is that it feels more like a series of
vignettes, tied together by a recurring character.  There's no real sense
of plot here.  Scenes don't logically lead into one another.  Because of
this, there's no real flow to the film, which makes it hard for the viewer
to really get into it.  
My main problem with the film, though, is a scene that comes late in the
picture.  It's a flashback to Norton's pre-skinhead days.  We see him
telling his father, who was killed a few weeks later, about the book he is
reading, which happens to be about a black character.  The way his father
reacts to this shows him to be a definite racist.  But the part I didn't
like, is the way the Norton character so easily accepted what his father
said.  The way the scene was done, it appeared that these were thoughts
Norton had never had.  I found it quite hard to believe that an
intelligent kid like that would *instantly* accept these racist theories
provided by his father, without questioning it at all.  The way the scene
plays, it feels like it wasn't even part of the original script.  It's
like some executives decided that they wanted a definite rationale for why
Norton would get involved with the skinheads.  Well, it doesn't work.
"American History X" is worth the price of admission simply to witness
Norton's incredible performance.  I have no doubt, that come Oscar time,
he'll be nominated.  It's the best performance of his career, and for that
reason alone, the film is worth seeing.

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
Starring Ben Affleck, Joanna Going, Rose McGowan, Liev Schrieber
"Phantoms" is based on a novel by Dean Koontz, one of my favorite authors.
In fact, I read the book about the same time I heard a movie was going to
be made, and loved it.  It was with this knowledge that I went into
"Phantoms" expecting a kick-ass horror flick.  Unfortunately, I was very
disappointed.
The movie isn't all that dissimiliar from the book, which isn't surprising
considering Koontz also wrote the screenplay.  The premise is simple:  A
young doctor and her sister enter the small town of Snowfield only to
discover that the entire population is either dead or missing.  With the
help of a few surviving police officers, they set out to discover what
happened to the town.  Peter O'Toole shows up a bit later to assist our
protagonists, as he is a reporter who may or may not know what it is that
they're dealing with.
You would think that a movie with a plot as relatively simple as that
would be a fast-paced horror/mystery.  But, with a director like Joe
Chappelle, you'd be wrong.  Chappelle, who's last film was "Halloween 6"
(arguably the worst of the series), hasn't the faintest idea how to direct
a full-length motion picture.  He ruins nearly every scene with multiple
point-of-view shots, super-fast editing, and shoddy camerawork.  He seems
to be under the false impression that fast editing and camera movements
equals a fast-pace.  All that does is disorient the viewer and confuse the
storyline.  Perhaps under the direction of a more experience director,
"Phantoms" would have been the excellent film I had hoped for.
The fault certainly doesn't lie with Koontz, who has crafted a superb
companion piece to his excellent novel.  Nor does it lie with the young
cast who attempt to make the best out of a bad situation.  Well, everyone
except Affleck, who seems rather out of place as the tough-as-nails
sheriff.  Affleck is an excellent actor (see "Good Will Hunting" for
proof), but, as Dirty Harry might say, "a man's got to know his
limitations". 
"Phantoms" had the potential to be a great horror film, but unfortunately,
it was saddled with a truly incompetent director.  Let's hope that the
next Koontz novel to make it to the big screen isn't helmed by a
third-rate, wannabe-auteur with delusions of grandeur.

Title
Review for Airport '77 (1977)
Starring Jack Lemmon, Jimmy Stewart, Lee Grant
"Airport '77", an entertaining disaster film, can easily be broken down
into three seperate sections.  First, we meet all the passengers on the
doomed flight.  This takes about 45 minutes.  Secondly, we see the evil
hijackers attempt to take over the ship and eventually fail.  This also
takes about 45 minutes.  Finally, the last half hour is devoted to the
rescue effort of the Coast Guard following the ship's crash into the
ocean.
Despite the predictable nature of the screenplay, "Airport '77" is
enjoyable enough, in a leave-your-brain-at-the-door type of way.  Jack
Lemmon stars as the earnest and dedicated captain who's determined to save
his ship and passengers.  Jimmy Stewart plays a rich business man who's
daughter and grand-daughter are on the flight.  He doesn't do much except
look really, really worried.  And of course, this being an "Airport"
movie, there are many stars on the flight.  Some will live, others will
die.  George Kennedy inexplicably shows up halfway through and starts
ordering people around.  I suppose he's here because he was in the
previous "Airport" films.
There's nothing terribly original about "Airport '77".  Everyone's just
going through the motions, including the always-great Jack Lemmon.  This
is a story that's been done many, many times before and one can sense that
the only reason a movie like this was even made was to assemble all these
aging stars that would otherwise be out-of-work.  If making movies like
this is what it takes to see actors like Olivia de Havilland and Joseph
Cotton working again, than so be it.  
Besides, the movie itself isn't all *that* bad, once you get past the
utter predictability of it.  For a film made in 1977, the special effects
aren't too shabby (of course, they're nothing compared to "Star Wars",
also released in'77), and there are moments of genuine excitment.  
"Airport '77" isn't exactly ground-breaking entertainment, but it is worth
watching just for a chance to see a lot of legendary actors working in the
same movie.

Title
Review for Dance with a Stranger (1985)
Starring Miranda Richardson, Rupert Everett, Ian Holm
"Dance With A Stranger" is an awful film.  I just had to get that off my
chest before I went any further.  It is probably the worst film I've seen
since "Gummo", and, at the time, I figured it would be years before I saw
another movie at that level of "badness".  I was wrong.
"Dance With A Stranger" tells the story of Ruth Ellis, the last woman to
be hanged in England.  You'd think with such an interesting story like
that, you'd have a rich and exciting movie.  Well, you'd be sorely
mistaken.  The biggest problem with the film is that they don't bother
dealing with the fact that Ellis was the last woman to be executed.  In
fact, we don't see her crime until the last two minutes of the film, with
the remainder of her story told to us through cards at the very end of the
movie.  The rest of the film follows Ruth and her relationships with
Everett and Holm.  And that's it.
I completely did not care at all about Ellis' background or what motive
she may have had to commit the crime responsible for her death.  It may
have been appropriate to give us a little bit of history of her life, just
so that we can relate to her a bit, but to completely avoid any discussion
of why her life is worthy of being made into a film, is inexcusable.  By
the time we see her commit her crime, we are under the impression that she
actually *deserves* to be executed.  Well, at least I was.  I had no
sympathy for her, and I was actually hoping that the filmmakers would at
least show her being hanged.  No such luck.
Miranda Richardson made her screen debut in this film, and it's a miracle
she was able to find any other work after.  She is simply terrible in this
movie.  She plays Ruth Ellis as a whiney and hysterical woman who has no
idea what she wants.  This character got on my nerves after only 2 minutes
of screen time.  I had to sit through another 100 minutes of watching her
"bitch and moan"!  It was painful.
Ian Holm and Rupert Everett give competent performances as the men in her
life.  But we don't really get to find out too much about them, since the
film is focused primarily on Ruth Ellis' story.
I don't know if I can stress this enough, but "Dance With A Stranger" is a
BAD BAD BAD BAD movie.  If you ever come across it on television some
time, quickly flip to the next channel.  Heck, if you're ever walking
along, and you see a copy of it just laying on the ground, stomp on it
until it is unrecognizable.

Title
Review for Uncle Sam (1996)
Picking up "Uncle Sam" from my local video store, I was expecting
a cheesy, low-budget gore-fest.  The packaging contains a 3D
photograph on the front depicting Uncle Sam pointing at the
viewer, with a tagline that reads: "Uncle Sam wants you...DEAD!"
As I began watching, though, I slowly started to realize that
there was a lot more to this movie than shock value.  Yes, 
much of the film has "Uncle Sam" wandering around in a cheap
costume inventively killing innocent bystanders, but surprisingly
enough, there is more to it than that.  In fact, for about the
first 45 minutes, there's virtually no gore at all.  Up to that
point, it's a somewhat serious look at the effects war has on
family members left behind.
See, "Uncle Sam" is a soldier in the Gulf war that presumably
died due to friendly fire, and much of the first half of the 
film is about his family's reaction to the news that he has 
(supposedly) passed away.  Apparently, he was not such a nice man, 
so his sister and wife are actually quite happy that he is dead.
However, his nephew looks up to him as a hero, so he naturally
gets quite upset when folks start bad mouthing his dear old Uncle
Sam (yes, his first name actually *is* Sam).  
Anyway, the rotting corpse of Uncle Sam finally shows up and starts
murdering people.  He mostly just kills people who are foolish
enough to disrespect "the American way of life", such as a gang
of teenagers who desecrate Sam's grave.  His methods of elimination
border on the ridiculous at times (one poor sap is murdered by
being impaled by an American flag), but I suppose that is par for
the course in a movie like this.
Something that really surprised me was the amount of familiar
faces in the movie.  Isaac Hayes has a prominent role as a one
of Sam's old Army buddies, Timothy Bottoms ("Apocalypse Now")
plays a peace loving teacher who meets a gruesome end at the
hands of not-so-peace loving Uncle Sam, and even Robert Forster
(in one of his many low-budget, pre-"Jackie Brown" roles) has a
bit part as a Senator who is killed for no discernable reason.
Fans of the genre expecting a non-stop gore fest out of "Uncle Sam"
will be sorely disappointed.  It would appear as though the 
filmmakers were actually trying to make a serious point on the
nature of war with this movie.  But trying to do that within
the constraints of the horror genre was a big mistake; it just
doesn't work.  About the best way for me to sum up "Uncle Sam"
would be to call it a not-so-successful, but always entertaining,
experiment.

Title
Review for Near Dark (1987)
Starring Lance Henrikson, Bill Paxton, Adrian Pasdar
In "Near Dark", director Kathryn Bigelow takes the vampire myth and does
something completely different with it.  She makes them likeable.  It's 
not too often that we find ourselves rooting for people who kill
indiscriminitely.
This family of vampires is lead by Jessie (Lance Henrikson) and early
on in the film, he explains to the newcomer (Adrian Pasdar) that they
don't kill for fun, rather to survive.  One wonders why they couldn't 
just feast on criminals instead of innocent civilians, but that issue
is never addressed.  Bill Paxton is also on hand playing the fun-loving,
"rebel" vampire who has a penchant for finding creative ways of 
dispatching his victims.
"Near Dark" is a fun movie.  I don't think it was intended to be taken
too seriously.  And as with Bigelow's other films, it has a real sense
of style.  There's a rumour that she didn't even direct this, rather
her husband-at-the-time Jim Cameron did.  I don't think this is so, 
however.  Cameron prefers a more clinical style, where he shoots
more from a distance, so that the audience never really connects with
the characters.  Bigelow, on the other hand, takes us right in there,
so that we are face-to-face with these people, which pretty much forces
us to associate with her characters to some degree.
Also, as with "Blue Steel" and "Strange Days", "Near Dark" features very
strong female characters.  The character of Mae, for example, is
initially thought to be rather timid and meek.  But, as the movie
progresses, we see that there's more to her than meets the eye.  Sure,
she's not as "out there" as Bill Paxton's character (as with most of
Paxton's early roles, he steals every scene he's in), but she is as 
strong as any of the other "family" members, both physically and 
mentally.
Of course, none of this would matter if the film wasn't any good.
Fortunately, this isn't the case.  "Near Dark" is about as fast-paced
as movies come, and even when it does slow down for scenes of 
exposition, we're always interested in finding out more about this
bizarre family of vampires.
"Near Dark" may not be as accomplished on a techinical level as 
something like "Blue Steel", but it certainly displays Bigelows flair
for visceral thrills.  And fans of Bill Paxton should certainly check
this one out, since he's pretty much playing Hicks from "Aliens", 
except as a vampire.  
"Near Dark" isn't anything terribly deep or thought-provoking, but it's
a good way to spend an hour and a half.

Title
Review for Without Limits (1998)
Starring Billy Crudup, Donald Sutherland, Monica Potter
"Without Limits" is the second film in less than a year to tell the story
of Steve Prefontaine, one of the greatest runners in American History. 
The first was called "Prefontaine", and I did not like it much.  It
started off well enough, but then ran out of steam too quickly.  "Without
Limits", unfortunately, follows the same pattern.
"Without Limits" stars relative unknown Billy Crudup as the charismatic
Prefontaine, and Sutherland as his coach and mentor, Bill Bowerman.  The
performances are top-notch, with Crudup giving a star-making performance
as the doomed athelete.  Monica Potter is the only weak link in the cast. 
It seems she was hired simply because she is pretty, because she elicited
no interest from myself.  I was bored everytime she was on screen, and
found her performance comprable to a Cigar Store Indian, except the Cigar
Store Indian is much more interesting to look at.
As with "Prefontaine", the movie starts out quite well.  During the first
half-hour, I was relieved to find that the director, the legendary Robert
Towne, had chosen to film Pre's story in a linear fashion, unlike the
earlier film, which was shot in a pseudo-documentary style which was
exceptionally distracting.  However, as the movie progressed, I found
myself experiencing a sense of deja vu.  Like "Prefontaine", I was
becoming more and more impatient with the film as it went on.  Once Pre
goes to the Olympics, is there really much more to say?  I don't think so.
All that stuff about his fight with the Amateur Athletes Association was
nothing but filler.  A movie about a world-famous runner should concern
itself with only what made the man such a legend.  I don't care whether or
not he was a lothario off the track, I only want to know about what
happened *on* the track.
Since I have disliked this film and "Prefontaine", I can come to only one
conclusion:  While Pre may have been the greatest runner of his time, his
life just isn't filmable.  He didn't do enough to fill a two-hour running
time.  
"Without Limits" is worthwhile only for the performances of it's two
leads, and nothing else.
-- 
David Nusair                                      dnusair@chat.carleton.ca
Come visit my "Reel Film Reviews" site! "http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair" 

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
Starring Tom Hanks, Meg Ryan, Parker Posey, Greg Kinnear, Steve Zahn
"You've Got Mail" is the very definition of a "cute" movie.  It's got cute
stars, a cute story-line, and even cute pets.  Despite this over-whelming
cuteness (or maybe because of it), I loved "You've Got Mail".
I know, I know.  I'm supposed to be a film critic.  I'm not supposed to
love transparent and formula pictures like this.  But darn it, somewhere
along the way, "You've Got Mail" reeled me in, hook, line, and sinker.
The movie stars Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan as two somewhat unhappy New Yorkers
who meet in an AOL online chat room and quickly become close friends,
without ever knowing each others identity.  As the movie progresses,
though, they begin to discover that they have a lot in common with each
other.  Meanwhile, in "real-life", they are bitter competitors.  She owns
a quaint little children's bookstore, he owns one of those gigantic
super-bookstores that offer impersonal service and discount prices.  While
his store threatens to run her store out of business, their online
relationship grows stronger.
"You've Got Mail" is as artificial as movies come.  Everything is nice and
happy and by the end, all the characters have gotten exactly what they
wanted out of life.  There are no real conflicts, no major
disappointments, no unresolved issues.  Nevertheless, I quite enjoyed it. 
In fact, I can't remember the last time I had such a good time at the
movies. 
I think sometimes you have to be able to watch a movie and just get drawn
into it.  The fact that stars Hank and Ryan are at the top of their game
does not hurt either.  In particular, Hanks is at his best here, turning
his "charm-meter" up to 11.  Everytime he was on screen, he had my full
attention.  And despite the fact that he was driving little bookstores out
of business, I was rooting for him.  It was good to see Hanks back doing
what he does best:  Playing the affable everyman.
"You've Got Mail" certainly won't be winning any awards, but as an
exercise in pure entertainment, it's as good as it gets.

Title
Review for Sullivans, The (1944)
"The Fighting Sullivans" contains a major plot development in the last ten
minutes that every movie guide has seen fit to give away.  There was no
dramatic tension for me while watching the film, as I knew exactly what
was going to happen.  And that's the worst thing that can happen before
viewing a movie.  Because of this, I will tread lightly so I don't ruin it
for anyone reading this review, and it would be very advisable to avoid
all other material regarding this film until after you have seen it.
"The Fighting Sullivans" revolves around a family that consists of a
mother, father, sister, and five brothers.  The brothers are very close,
despite the occasional disagreement.  They are inseperable, and never
stray from one another.  Their friendship and loyalty is the foundation of
this picture.
The first half of the movie follows the brothers as young children, and
their various adventures.  When four of them get into a fight with some
local boys, the youngest Sullivan, who is inside a Church at the time,
comes running out to assist, but not before properly exiting the chapel.  
If I'm being awfully vague about details, it's because what I have told
you is essentially the first hour and a half.  All I can say is go watch
this film, because it is a fine portrait of a family that sticks together,
through the good and the bad.
And after you see the movie, you will understand why this review has been
written the way it has.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Starring Robert DeNiro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow
When I originally saw the trailer for "Analyze This" a few months ago, I
must admit, I thought it looked kind of lame.  And then when the
commercials started popping up a week or two ago, I thought it looked
outright bad.  But then when "Analyze This" finally opened a few days ago,
an odd thing happened.  It got great reviews.  Critics were proclaiming it
"hilarious" and a "dead-on parody of mob movies".  Well, with praise like
that, I figured, it must be good and so I headed off to the theater.  You
know that expression that says always trust your gut instincts?  Well,
turns out that expression is more valid than I ever gave it credit for.
"Analyze This" is slow, unfunny, and badly acted.  Don't get me wrong, I
think that DeNiro is one of the top ten greatest actors of the century,
but he is just out of his league here.  I think the problem is he didn't
quite know how to approach this material.  He plays his character, mob
boss Paull Vitti, somewhere in between the realm of comedy and drama.  If
he had played the character straight, along the lines of Leslie Nielson in
the "Naked Gun" series, he probably would have been a lot more successful. 
As it is, though, he plays the character completely serious at some
moments, and for laughs at others.  This doesn't work.  It creates
an uneven character that never breaks out of the DeNiro mold; you always
know it's him.
And the movie is badly paced, too.  It never takes off.  It just crawls
from one scene to another without any forward momentum.  I think the blame
for this should be placed on the script.  It's obvious the writer had a
good idea for a movie, mob boss faces breakdown and needs the services of a
psychiatrist, but once this is established, the movie doesn't really go
anywhere.  The formula of the film seems to be this:  Billy Crystal says
no to DeNiro, DeNiro forces him, and much wackiness ensues.  This formula
of sorts is repeated several times throughout the movie.
I've said it before and I'll say it again:  The only thing that matters to
me in a comedy is whether or not it's funny.  If "Analyze This" had been
funny, the pacing and bad acting wouldn't have bothered me.  I would have
been too busy laughing to notice.  But as it is, I only chuckled a few
times.  The only really funny scene is a dead-on parody of "The
Godfather".  Sadly, though, I don't think anyone in the audience I saw it
with realized it was a parody, because I was the only one laughing.
But my sense of humour, I have come to realize, is vastly different from
the general population.  I loathed "There's Something About Mary", yet
loved "BASEketball".  Now, if you want a movie that *I* think is funny, go
out and see "Office Space".  It's full of genuine laughs and won't leave
you glancing at your watch every 10 minutes, as "Analyze This" did.
-- 
David Nusair                                http://chat.carleton.ca/~dnusair"As I have pointed out before, Andre Rousimoff's portrayal of a giant in
"The Princess Bride", Richard Dawson's portrayal of an obnoxious game show
host in "The Running Man", and Courtney Love's portrayal of a junkie hooker
in "The People vs Larry Flynt"."
        -R. Wiley on the all-time biggest Oscar snubs

Title
Review for Footloose (1984)
Starring Kevin Bacon, Lori Singer, John Lithgow
"Footloose" has only one goal in mind: to reel in an audience with cheesy
sentiment and feel-good antics.  And I hate to admit it; I fell for it.
The movie is about a teenager (Bacon) who moves to a small town from the
big city, and discovers that dancing has been banned by the local Reverend
(Lithgow).  He ends up falling for the preacher's daughter (Singer) and
showing the whole town what the magic of dance can do.
As mentioned at the beginning of this review, "Footloose" is an extremely
hokey and predictable teen drama.  There are virtually no surprises, and
the writing is second-rate.  So why did I enjoy it so much?  For one
thing, the cast is great.  Kevin Bacon oozes charisma in an early role. 
We're rooting for him right from the start, and, unlike most films of this
genre, Bacon doesn't play him as the "Rebel without a Clue" sort.  Yes, he
does rebel, but he's also polite when he needs to be.  And he never
broods. 
The rest of the cast is equally impressive.  John Lithgow, seen here
playing a normal guy for a change, is playing a man who would normally be
a flat out villian.  But Lithgow plays him as a concerned father who is
trying to do what he feels is best for his daughter.  By the end of the
film, we feel a genuine sense of love and understanding between him and
the Lori Singer character.  
Another nice touch is the music.  We see the parents of the kids
complaining that the music they listen to is filled with "sexual
innuendos", but that's not true at all.  The title track, performed by
Kenny Loggins, is upbeat and fun.  During the final sequence, I was
overcome with the urge to get off the couch and start dancing.  Of course,
I soon realized that would be a little pathetic.
Anyway, "Footloose" is a charming little surprise.  Don't let the premise
prevent you from watching it.  It sucked me in, and it'll do the same to
you. 

Title
Review for Gentleman's Agreement (1947)
In "Gentlemen's Agreement", Gregory Peck stars as a reporter who 
assumes a Jewish identity in order to expose the biases of 1940's
society.  Watching the movie from a 90's perspective, it was a 
little difficult for me to associate with what Peck's character
was trying to do.  I think it's safe to say that, in 1999, overt
and obvious anti-semeticism has been virtually eliminated.  Yes,
there remains a number of individuals who still feel that one
particular race is superior over another, but that kind of racism
is no longer as polite as it was back in the 1940's.  Nowadays,
people hurl bricks through "offensive" stores and burn crosses;
back then, according to "Gentlemen's Agreement", people were
refused employment and stared at in public places.
The movie does have a lot of important things to say, it's just
that most of it is moot in this day and age.  It seems to be 
saying that back in the 40's, it was okay to be racist, as long
as you were subtle and somewhat polite about it.
Peck gives an excellent performance as the writer who starts
to alienate his friends as he falls deeper and deeper into his
story.  His obsession with finding out the truth ends up doing
more harm to his life than good.  When he discovers that a woman
he has been seeing is an anti-semite (a good-natured anti-semite,
but an anti-semite nonetheless), he quickly drops her.  
An entertaining film throughout, "Gentleman's Agreement" is 
nevertheless about half an hour too long.  This is pretty much
a one-note film, and after a while, the subject matter begins
to take over and drag down the pace.  Despite this, Peck and the
other actors managed to hold my interest just because they are 
such fine actors.
The director, Elia Kazan, was likely taking a huge leap of faith
with this picture, but watching it today, it comes off rather 
tame.  It's well made, don't get me wrong, the subject matter
just seems like such a non-issue in this day and age.

Title
Review for Magic Town (1947)
In "Magic Town", Jimmy Stewart is in peak form playing a pollster who
heads to a "perfect" town to gauge their reactions on the sorts of issues
that only poll-takers care about.  However, as time progresses, and he
finds himself falling in love with the town (and a woman), he begins to
see that what he's doing is wrong.
The plot is standard stuff, but that's not important.  In a film like
this, it's the calibre of the actors that make or break it.  Obviously,
since Stewart stars, that's practically a non-issue.  He's great in the
film, as usual.  There's just something about him that always manages to
be endearing, even when he's deceiving the town folk.  You're always on
his side, and you desperately want to see all of his goals come to
fruitition. 
The film was directed by a longtime Frank Capra script-writer, and it
shows.  This is the type of feel-good picture that Capra is famous for. 
By the time "The End" shows up on screen, everything has been wrapped up
very nicely.  There are no loose ends, and virtually every character gets
a happy ending (those that deserve one, anyway).  In this age of cynicism,
it's refreshing to see a movie so upbeat.
"Magic Town" is a delightfully entertaining motion picture.  If you
believe all old movies are slow-paced, you'd be well-advised to check this
one out.
